Utah statutes.
72-6-106.   Use of recycled asphalt.
(1)  In making plans, specifications, and estimates, and in advertising for
bids under this chapter, the department shall allow up to 25% but may allow up
to 60% reclaimed asphalt pavement to be incorporated into hot asphaltic
concrete used for road construction and maintenance.
(2)  The department shall ensure that hot asphaltic concrete incorporating
reclaimed asphalt pavement meets or exceeds the department quality standards
for roads constructed or maintained with hot asphaltic concrete not containing
reclaimed asphalt pavement.
(3)  If the department rejects any hot asphaltic concrete containing reclaimed
asphalt pavement, the department shall give a written statement to the
provider indicating the specific reasons the hot asphaltic concrete was
rejected.
(4)  This section does not authorize the state to directly or indirectly
subsidize the production of hot asphaltic concrete containing reclaimed
asphalt pavement.
